Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1015
Centralized location; resolution board; designation; duties.

The election commissioner or county clerk shall designate at least two members of the counting board to act as a resolution board to resolve questions as to the legality of votes to be counted. The members of the resolution board shall be of equal number from different political parties. Any issue as to the legality of a vote shall be resolved unanimously by the resolution board. If a unanimous decision cannot be obtained, the ballot shall be rejected as to the vote in question.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 309.